Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6063XC (1) 91 dg/ko S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 135C.34, Code 2026, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 135C.34 Medication aide ââ certification. 3 1. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing , 4 in cooperation with other appropriate agencies, shall establish 5 a procedure to allow a person who is certified as a medication 6 aide in another state to become certified in this state upon 7 completion and passage of both the certified nurse aide and 8 certified medication aide challenge examinations, without 9 additional requirements for certification, including but 10 not limited to, required employment in this state prior to 11 certification. 12 2. a. The department shall establish a medication aide 13 certification registry on the departmentâs internet site. The 14 medication aide certification registry shall allow a person 15 offering a department-approved medication aide certification 16 examination to upload proof that an individual successfully 17 completed the medication aide certification examination. 18 b. The department shall not charge a fee for a person 19 to upload proof that an individual successfully completed a 20 medication aide certification examination. 21 3. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 22 to administer this section . 23 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 135C.34A Medication aides ââ rules. 24 1. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 25 17A governing properly trained persons charged with the 26 responsibility of administering nonparenteral medications at 27 nursing facilities that include all of the following: 28 a. A rule authorizing a department-approved medication 29 aide challenge examination to be administered by an 30 area community college shall also authorize other 31 department-approved competency evaluation programs to 32 administer a department-approved medication aide challenge 33 examination. 34 b. A rule which states that before a nursing student 35 -1- LSB 6063XC (1) 91 dg/ko 1/ 4 S.F. _____ may take a department-approved medication aide challenge 1 examination in place of taking a medication aide course, 2 the individual must provide to the community college a 3 specified written statement, shall also state that other 4 department-approved competency evaluation programs can receive 5 the statement. 6 c. Any rules necessary to ensure consistency in all 7 provisions relating to certified medication aide training and 8 qualifications. 9 2. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 10 shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A governing 11 properly trained persons charged with the responsibility of 12 administering nonparenteral medications at intermediate care 13 facilities for persons with mental illness that include all of 14 the following: 15 a. A rule authorizing a department-approved medication 16 aide challenge examination to be administered by an 17 area community college shall also authorize other 18 department-approved competency evaluation programs to 19 administer a department-approved medication aide challenge 20 examination. 21 b. A rule which states that before a nursing student or a 22 graduate nurse may take a department-approved medication aide 23 challenge examination in place of taking a medication aide 24 course, the individual must provide to the community college 25 a specified written statement, shall also state that other 26 department-approved competency evaluation programs can receive 27 the statement. 28 c. Any rules necessary to ensure consistency in all 29 provisions relating to certified medication aide training and 30 qualifications. 31 Sec. 3. ADMINISTRATIVE RULES. 32 1. Rescission of administrative rules. 33 a. The following Iowa administrative rules are rescinded as 34 of July 1, 2026: 35 -2- LSB 6063XC (1) 91 dg/ko 2/ 4 S.F. _____ (1) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 58.21, subrule 6, 1 paragraph âcâ. 2 (2) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 58.21, subrule 6, 3 paragraph âdâ, subparagraph (4). 4 (3) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 58.21, subrule 6, 5 paragraph âeâ, unnumbered paragraph 2. 6 (4) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 65.17, subrule 1, 7 paragraph âcâ. 8 (5) 481 Iowa administrative code, rule 65.17, subrule 1, 9 paragraph âdâ, subparagraph (4). 10 b. As soon as practicable after July 1, 2026, the Iowa 11 administrative code editor shall remove the language of the 12 Iowa administrative rules referenced in paragraph âaâ from the 13 Iowa administrative code. 14 2. Conforming changes to rules. The department of 15 inspections, appeals, and licensing may engage in rulemaking 16 pursuant to chapter 17A to make any conforming changes to rules 17 necessary to implement this Act. 18